particles/prep.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Prepositions
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013


Multichar_Symbols +Prep +Apo

LEXICON Root
a		PREP;
a:ad	VOCPREP;
aifer	PREP;
amez	PREP;
areguard	PREP;
avant	PREP;
concernent	PREP;
cun		PREP;
cunter PREP;
da		PREP;
da:dad	VOCPREP;
da:d'	VOCPREP;
dadi	PREP;
dador	PREP;
danor	PREP;
dapi	PREP;
dasper	PREP;
davart	PREP;
davent	PREP;
durant	PREP;
en		PREP;
encunter PREP;
enfin	PREP;
enten	PREP;
enturn	PREP;
fin		PREP;
malgrà	PREP;
or		PREP;
ora		PREP;
ord		PREP;
oravant	PREP;
ordaifer	PREP;
per		PREP;
senza	PREP;
si		PREP;
sin		PREP;
sper	PREP;
suenter	PREP;
sut		PREP;
tar     PREP;
tenor	PREP;
tranter	PREP;
tras	PREP;
vers	PREP;

!! Morphology endings:
LEXICON PREP
+Prep:0	#;

LEXICON VOCPREP
+Prep+Apo:0	#;
